Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14.1 Lenders and Loan Brokers

19-14.1-1.
Confessions of judgment — Incomplete instruments prohibited.

No lender or loan broker shall take any confession of judgment, or any power of attorney, except a power of attorney or power of sale authorizing the lender or loan broker in case of default in payment of interest or principal, to enforce the provisions of any chattel mortgage or pledge. No lender or loan broker shall take any note, promise to pay, or security that does not accurately disclose the actual amount of the loan, the time for which it is made, and the agreed rate of interest nor any instrument in which blanks are left to be filled in after execution. The provisions of this section related to confessions of judgment and power of attorney shall not apply to real estate secured loans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53.

19-14.1-2.
Maximum rate of interest.

Every lender may lend or loan broker may negotiate the lending of any sum of money and may charge, contract for, and receive points, fees, charges, and interest on the unpaid balance of the loan at a rate not to exceed that provided in §

6-26-2

, or as otherwise permitted under applicable federal law or regulation.

Rebates of finance charges on precomputed loans, made for an original term of sixty (60) months or less, may be calculated on the method commonly referred to as the rule of 78 or sum of the digits. Rebates of finance charges on precomputed loans, made for an original term greater than sixty (60) months, must be calculated on the simple interest method.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 10; P.L. 2003, ch. 79, § 3; P.L. 2003, ch. 82, § 3.

19-14.1-3.
Unemployment insurance defined.

For the purposes of this chapter, involuntary unemployment insurance coverage shall not be a factor in the approval by the lender or loan broker of any loan. The lender or loan broker shall give and maintain specific written indication that the cost of this coverage is disclosed to the debtor; that the coverage is not a condition for the extension of credit; and that the debtor voluntarily desires the coverage. The debtor shall be given written notice of his or her right to cancel within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the insurance policy and that the cancellation will result in a full refund of any premiums paid. Unemployment resulting from a labor dispute shall be deemed involuntary unemployment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53.

19-14.1-4.
Documents delivered to borrower — Advance payments — Release of security.

Every lender or loan broker, as applicable, who is the holder of any note shall:

Give to any borrower, or the borrower’s agent, making a loan payment a plain and complete receipt for all payments on the loan at the time the payment is made in person at the lender’s or loan broker’s office;

Except for an open-end loan, upon written request from the borrower, the holder of a subordinate mortgage loan instrument shall deliver to the borrower, within ten (10) days from receipt of a written request, a statement of the borrower’s account showing the date and amount of all payments made or credited to the account and the total unpaid balance. Not more than two (2) such statements shall be required in any twelve-month (12) period;

Permit payment to be made in advance in any amount on any contract of loan at any time, but the lender or loan broker may apply the payment first to all interest in full at the agreed rate and other permitted charges, up to the date of the payment. Any broker fees, points, or origination fees shall not be subject to any required refund;

Upon repayment of the loan in full, mark indelibly every obligation and security signed by the borrower with the word “paid” or “canceled” and release any mortgage, restore any pledge, cancel and return any note, or a copy of the note, and cancel and return any assignment, or a copy of the assignment, given to the lender or loan broker by the borrower;

Issue mortgage discharges in accordance with the provision of chapter 26 of title 34; and

In the case of educational loans, deliver to the borrower a written statement that discloses the name and address of the borrower and licensee; the name of each payee to whom disbursements will be made; the date and total amount of the loan commitment; a description of the payment schedule; the amount of any insurance procured by the lender with a summary of the nature and extent of coverage; the total amount of all insurance premiums to be collected by the licensee; the schedule of any disbursements to be made to the borrower; and the method by which the schedule of any disbursements to an educational institution will be determined.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53.

19-14.1-5.
Instrument evidencing loan, contents.

No loan document shall contain:

Any acceleration clause under which any part or all of the unpaid balance of the obligation not yet matured may be declared due and payable because the holder deems himself or herself to be insecure;

Any power of attorney to confess judgment or any other power of attorney except a statutory power of sale;

Any provision whereby the debtor waives any rights accruing to him or her under the provisions of this title or any other law expressly prohibiting such waiver;

Except for a change in the payment schedule as a result of the borrower’s default or delinquency, or pursuant to an agreement involving a court proceeding, any requirement that more than one installment be payable in any one installment period; or

Any assignment of or order for the payment of any salary, wages, commission, or other compensation for services, or any part thereof, earned or to be earned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 10.

19-14.1-6.
Assignment of earnings.

The payment in money, credit, goods, or things in action, as consideration for any sale or assignment of, or order for, the payment of wages, salary, commissions, or other compensation for services, whether earned or to be earned, shall, for the purposes of regulation under this chapter, be deemed a loan secured by the assignment, and the amount that the assigned compensation exceeds the amount of consideration actually paid shall, for the purposes of regulation under this chapter, be deemed interest upon the loan from the date of the payment to the date the compensation is payable. The transaction shall be governed by and subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53.

19-14.1-7.
Assignment of wages simultaneous with loan — Liens on furniture.

No assignment of, or order for, payment of any salary, wages, commissions, or other compensation for services, earned or to be earned, given to secure any loan made by any licensee under this chapter, shall be valid unless the amount of the loan is paid to the borrower simultaneously with its execution; nor shall the assignment or order, or any chattel mortgage or other lien on household furniture then in the possession and use of the borrower be valid unless it is in writing, signed in person by the borrower, nor if the borrower is married unless it is signed in person by both husband and wife, provided that written assent of a spouse shall not be required when husband and wife have been living separate and apart for a period of at least five (5) months prior to the making of the assignment, order, mortgage, or lien.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53.

19-14.1-8.
Escrow accounts.

All fees paid by clients or residential mortgage loan applicants to a lender or loan broker prior to the closing of the loan in connection with which those fees are paid, shall be deposited in one or more escrow accounts maintained at a federally-insured-deposit-taking institution. The account(s) shall contain only those funds collected from clients or residential mortgage loan applicants. Fees shall include, but are not limited to: application fees, appraisal fees, title attorney fees, title insurance fees, credit report fees, rate lock fees, or other similar fees.

A lender or loan broker may offset related funds in the escrow account(s) against commissions to which it is entitled in accordance with the contract for services actually performed or for reimbursement for the fees described in the immediately preceding paragraph paid directly by the lender or loan broker to third parties. All offsets shall be accounted for through written documentation evidencing the amount of offset.

The lender or loan broker shall maintain complete and accurate records of all escrow accounts and shall produce, upon request, all documents pertaining to escrow account activity including, but not limited to: bank statements, check stubs, canceled, voided, or unused checks, deposit tickets, and reconciliations or other comparable account records.

No licensee governed by this chapter shall commingle money collected for fees from clients or residential mortgage loan applicants with its own funds or use any part of a client’s or residential mortgage loan applicant’s money in the conduct of the lender’s or loan broker’s business until those fees or moneys have been offset as provided for in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53.

19-14.1-9.
Penalties.

Any person or entity and the several members, officers, directors, agents and employees thereof, who or that knowingly violates, or participates in the violation of any of the applicable provisions of this chapter, or any regulation promulgated thereunder, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction of this violation, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense. Complaints under the provisions of this chapter may be made by the director, or the director’s designee, and the director, or the director’s designee, shall not be required to give surety for costs. The attorney general shall prosecute all complaints under this chapter.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this chapter may also be subject to a civil monetary penalty, in the discretion of the court. For unintentional violations, to be determined by the court, the award may include actual damages sustained by the applicant or borrower, as the case may be, as a result of the violation, plus a penalty in an amount not greater than one hundred dollars ($100) per violation. For intentional violations, to be determined by the court, the award may include actual damages sustained by the applicant or borrower, as the case may be, as a result of the violation, plus a penalty in an amount not greater than five hundred dollars ($500) per violation. A person’s failure to take action to correct the violation within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the court, following notice to the person of the violation by the director, or the director’s designee, pursuant to a final written report or other written notice, may be evidence of an intentional violation under this subsection (b) with respect to violations committed after the notice and the expiration of a reasonable time period for correction of the violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53.

19-14.1-10.
Special exemptions.

The licensing provisions of chapter 14 of this title shall not apply to:

Nonprofit charitable, educational, or religious corporations or associations;

Any person who makes less than six (6) loans in this state in any consecutive twelve-month (12) period; there is no similar exemption from licensing for loan brokers for brokering loans or acting as a loan broker;

Any person acting as an agent for a licensee for the purpose of conducting closings at a location other than that stipulated in the license;

Regulated institutions and banks or credit unions organized under the laws of the United States, or subject to written notice with a designated Rhode Island agent for service of process in the form prescribed by the director, or the director’s designee, of any other state within the United States if the laws of the other state in which such bank or credit union is organized authorizes under conditions not substantially more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of this state, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, a financial institution or credit union to engage in the business of originating or brokering loans in the other state; no bank or credit union duly organized under the laws of any other state within the United States may receive deposits, pay checks, or lend money from any location within this state unless such bank or credit union has received approval from the director, or the director’s designee, for the establishment of an interstate branch office pursuant to chapter 7 of title 19;

Any natural person employee who is employed by a licensee when acting on the licensee’s behalf; provided that this exemption shall not apply to a mortgage loan originator required to be licensed under §

19-14-2

or §

19-14.10-4

; or

A licensed attorney when performing loan closing services for a licensee or for an entity identified in subdivision (4) above.

The provisions of this chapter and chapter 14 of this title shall not apply to:

Loans to corporations, joint ventures, partnerships, limited liability companies or other business entities;

Loans over twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in amount to individuals for business or commercial, as opposed to personal, family or household purposes;

Loans principally secured by accounts receivable and/or business inventory;

Loans made by a life insurance company wholly secured by the cash surrender value of a life insurance policy;

Education-purpose loans made by the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation as vested in chapter 38.1 of title 45 of the Rhode Island student loan authority as vested in chapter 62 of title 16;

The acquisition of retail or loan installment contracts by an entity whose sole business in this state is acquiring them from federal banks receivers or liquidators;

Notes evidencing the indebtedness of a retail buyer to a retail seller of goods, services or insurance for a part or all of the purchase price;

Any municipal, state or federal agency that makes, brokers, or funds loans or acts as a lender or a loan broker. This exemption includes exclusive agents or exclusive contractors of the agency specifically designated by the agency to perform those functions on behalf of the agency and which has notified the director, in writing, of the exclusive agency or contract; or

Notes evidencing the indebtedness of a retail buyer to a retail motor vehicle dealer that include as part of the amount financed, disclosed in accordance with 12 C.F.R. § 226.18 as amended, an amount representing negative equity related to the motor vehicle being traded in as part of the purchase price of the motor vehicle being purchased.

No license to make or fund loans, or to act as a lender or small loan lender shall be required of any person who engages in deferred deposit transactions (commonly known as “pay-day advance”) while holding a valid license to cash checks pursuant to chapter 14 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 10; P.L. 2000, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 2003, ch. 169, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 261, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 452, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 361, § 1.

19-14.1-11.
Rules and regulations.

The director, or the director’s designee, may adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53.

19-14.1-12.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 53.